Hawaii statutes.
§53-10 Appraisal of lands of agency.
At any time after the approval of the redevelopment plan and before disposing
of any of its lands or properties, the redevelopment agency shall appoint one
or more, but not more than three competent persons to make independent
appraisals of the value of its property, based upon the future use of the area
under the redevelopment plan. The appraisals shall serve only as a guide for
the agency in determining a fair price for the disposal of its land and
property but need not be adhered to in making the disposal, and shall become a
public record and subject to examination by any interested person after the
disposal. [L 1949, c 379, pt of §4; am L 1951, c 244, pt of §3; am L 1953, c
210, §3; RL 1955, §143-10; HRS §53-10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next